Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1132
Referees; how chosen; number.

In all cases of reference, the parties, except when an infant may be a party, may agree upon a suitable person or persons, not exceeding three, and the reference shall be ordered accordingly; and if the parties do not agree, the court shall appoint one or more referees, not exceeding three, who shall be free from exception.

R.S.1867, Code § 301, p. 445;

R.S.1913, § 7870;

C.S.1922, § 8815;

C.S.1929, § 20-1132;

R.S.1943, § 25-1132.

Failure to object to qualifications of referee until after approval of report precluded attack on that ground. Corn Belt Products Co. v. Mullins, 172 Neb. 561, 110 N.W.2d 845 (1961).